Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-470.03
Mobile operator's or driver's license, defined.

Mobile operator's or driver's license means an operator's or driver's license electronically stored on or accessed via an electronic device.

Laws 2022, LB750, § 48.